en: dried cep, dried porcini mushroom, dried porcini mushrooms
de: getrocknete Steinpilze
fi: kuivattu herkkutatti
fr: cèpes déshydratés
hr: sušeni vrganji
it: porcini secchi

en: summer cep, Boletus reticulatus, reticulatus
xx: Boletus reticulatus
de: Sommer-Steinpilz
es: boleto reticulado, boleto estival
fi: tammenherkkutatti
fr: Cèpe d'été, reticulatus
it: Porcino, fungo Porcino
la: Boletus reticulatus, Boletus aestivalis
pl: borowik usiatkowany

en: dark cep, bronze bolete
xx: Boletus aereus
de: dunkler Steinpilz
fr: Cèpe bronzé
it: Porcino nero, fungo Porcino nero, Moreccio
la: Boletus aereus, aereus
pl: borowik ciemnobrązowy

en: pine bolete
xx: Boletus pinophilus
de: Steinpilz
es: boleto pinícola
fi: männynherkkutatti
fr: Bolet pinicole
it: Porcino rosso
la: Boletus pinophilus, Boletus pinicola, pinicola
pl: borowik sosnowy

en: Leccinum
xx: Leccinum
pl: koźlarz, koźlarze
sk: kozák

en: red-capped scaber stalk
xx: Leccinum aurantiacum
cs: křemenáč dubový, křemenáč krvavý
pl: koźlarz czerwony

en: scaber stalk, birch bolete, rough-stemmed bolete
xx: Leccinum scabrum
cs: kozák březový
de: Gemeiner Birkenpilz
pl: koźlarz babka
sk: kozák brezový

en: Imleria
xx: Imleria
pl: Podgrzyb, podgrzybek, podgrzybki

en: Imleria badia, bay bolete
xx: Imleria badia
de: Maronen-Röhrling
es: boleto bayo
fr: Bolet bai
pl: Podgrzyb brunatny, podgrzybek brunatny

en: cultivated mushroom
de: Zuchtchampignons, Zucht-Champignons
es: seta cultivada, setas cultivadas, setas frescas cultivadas
fr: champignon cultivé, champignons cultivés
hr: uzgojena gljiva
nl: gekweekte paddestoelen

en: champignon, cultivated mushrooms, cup mushroom
af: Sampioen
ar: غاريقون ثنائي البوغ
bg: култивирана печурка, печурки, гъби Печурка
ca: xampinyó, bolet cultivat
cs: pečárka dvouvýtrusá
cy: Madarch meithrin
da: Havechampignon, champignon, champignoner
de: Champignons, Zucht-Champignon, Champignon
eo: Ĉampinjono
es: Agaricus bisporus, champinon cultivado, champinon cultivados
et: šampinjon, šampinjonid, aedšampinjon
fa: قارچ خوراکی تکمه‌ای
fi: herkkusieni
fr: champignon de Paris, champignons de Paris, Agaricus bisporus
gl: Champiñón común
he: פקועה דו-נבגית
hi: श्वेत बटन खुम्ब
hr: gljive, gljive šampinjoni, šampinjoni, bijela gljiva
hu: Kétspórás csiperke
hy: Շամպինյոն
ia: Champignon commun
id: Jamur kancing
io: Champiniono
is: Matkempingur
it: champignon, funghi champignon, fungo bianco
ja: マッシュルーム
ko: 양송이
la: Agaricus bisporus, agaricus brunnescens
li: Champignon
lt: Dvisporis pievagrybis
lv: Dārza atmatene
mn: Цагаан мөөг
ms: Cendawan butang
nb: Sjampinjong
nl: champignons, champignon, Parijse champignons
pl: pieczarki, Pieczarka dwuzarodnikowa, pieczarka, pieczarek, pieczarkowy, pieczarkowa, pieczarkowe, białe pieczarki, pieczarki białe, pieczarka biała
pt: cogumelos-de-Paris, Champignon
qu: Champiñun
ro: ciuperci champignon
ru: Шампиньон двуспоровый, шампиньоны сушеные
sl: Dvotrosni kukmak
sv: champinjon, champinjoner, vit champinjon, vita champinjoner, champinjon agaricus bisporus
ta: அகாரிகஸ் பைஸ்போரஸ்
uk: Печериця садова
zh: 雙孢蘑菇

en: portobello, portobella
xx: portobello
de: Portobello-Pilze
pl: portobello, pieczarki portobello

en: brown mushroom, brown mushrooms
de: braune Champignons, Champignons braun, braune Egerlinge
fr: champignon brun, champignons bruns
hr: kesten gljiva
nl: bruine champignon
pl: brązowe pieczarki, pieczarki brązowe, pieczarka brązowa

en: field mushroom
it: fungo prataiolo
la: agaricus spp.

en: honey mushroom
it: fungo del miele
la: armillaria mellea

en: Craterellus
xx: Craterellus
fr: Craterelle
pl: Lejkowiec

en: horn of plenty
bg: Тръбенка
ca: trompeta de la mort
cs: stroček trubkovitý
cy: Corn llawnder
de: Totentrompete
es: Craterellus, trompetas de la muerte
fi: Mustatorvisieni
fr: Trompettes de la mort
gl: Trompeta dos mortos
hr: crna trubača
hu: Sötét trombitagomba
it: trombetta dei morti
la: Craterellus cornucopioides
li: Trompèt van d'r doeëd
lt: Paprastasis trimitėlis
mk: црна труба
nb: Sort trompetsopp
nl: Doodstrompet
pl: Lejkowiec dęty
ro: Trâmbița morților
ru: Вороночник рожковидный
sl: Črna trobenta
sr: Мрка трубача
sv: Svart trumpetsvamp

en: kikurage mushroom
bo: མོག་དཀར།
cs: rosolovka řasotvará
de: Silberohr
fi: valkohytykkä
fr: Trémelle fucus
hr: gljiva kikurage
id: Jamur kuping putih
it: fungo Kikurage
ja: シロキクラゲ
jv: Jamur kuping putih
su: Lémbér bodas
uk: Сніжний гриб
vi: Mộc nhĩ trắng
za: Raetngaenz
zh: 銀耳

en: Tremella fuciformis
it: tremella fuciformis
la: Tremella fuciformis

en: milkcap
be: Млечнік
bg: Млечница
ca: Lactari
cs: ryzec
da: Mælkehat
de: Milchlinge
et: Riisikas
fi: Rouskut
fr: lactaire, lactaires
hr: mliječna kapica
hy: Կաթնասնկեր
it: lattario
ja: チチタケ属
ka: რძიანა სოკოები
la: Lactarius
lt: Piengrybis
lv: Cūceņu ģints
mk: млечка
nb: Risker
nl: melkzwam
pl: mleczaj
ru: Млечник
sl: Mlečnica
sv: Riskor
tt: Гөреҗдә
ud: Нингубиuk:Хрящ-молочник
zh: 乳菇屬